Utah statutes.
23-20-27.   Alteration of license, permit, tag or certificate a misdemeanor.

Any person who at any time alters or changes in any manner, with intent to defraud, any license, permit, tag or certificate of registration issued under provisions of this code or action of the Wildlife Board is guilty of a misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 33, 1973 General Session

